Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
669

QUIETING
TITLE

Part I. General Provisions

Section

669-1 Object of action

669-2 Defendants; unknown persons

669-3 Notice by publication or registered mail

669-3.5 Trial when legal title in controversy

669-4, 5 Repealed

669-6 Disclaimer, default, no costs

669-7 Repealed

669-8 Recording of judgment

Part II. Structure Position Discrepancies

669-11 De minimis structure position
discrepancies, defined

669-12 Consequences

669-13 Restrictions as to owner of property

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(3).

Case Notes

Act 73, L 2003, by declaring accreted land to be "public
land" and prohibiting littoral owners from registering existing accretion
under chapter 501 and/or quieting title under this chapter, permanently
divested a littoral owner of his or her ownership rights to any existing
accretions to oceanfront property that were unregistered or unrecorded as of
the effective date of Act 73 or for which no application for registration or
petition to quiet title was pending; thus, Act 73 effectuated a permanent
taking of such accreted lands without just compensation in violation of article
I, §20 of the Hawaii constitution. 122 H. 34 (App.), 222 P.3d 441 (2009).

Act 73, L 2003, by declaring accreted land to be "public
land" and prohibiting littoral owners from registering future accretion
under chapter 501 and/or quieting title under this chapter, did not effectuate
a taking of future accreted lands without just compensation in violation of
article I, §20 of the Hawaii constitution where plaintiffs had no vested right
to future accretions to their oceanfront land that may never materialize. 122
H. 34 (App.), 222 P.3d 441 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next